Washington statutes.
RCW 44.44.010

Office of state actuary—Created—Qualifications.

(1) There is hereby created an office within the legislative branch to be known as the office of the state actuary.

(2) The executive head of the office shall be the state actuary who shall be qualified by education and experience in the field of actuarial science.

[ 1987 c 25 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 19.]